District of Columbia statutes.
2-358.05

Surplus Property Sales Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Surplus Property Sales Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the CPO in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

There shall be deposited into the Fund:

(1)

Administrative fees collected pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to § 2-358.02a; and

(2)

Proceeds from the sale of surplus property by OCP.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used to pay the administrative costs of maintaining and disposing of surplus property, including the costs of online auctions.

(d)

Amounts in excess of the money needed to pay for the cost of online auction contracts for surplus personal property shall be deposited into the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 805
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1012(c), 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1012(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).